Utah statutes.
63G-17-202.   Air quality mitigation report and plan.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), and in accordance with Subsection (3):

(a)  on or before July 1, 2013, each school district shall submit to the State Board of Education, by email, a report on the mitigation efforts currently being used by the school district;

(b)  on or before August 1, 2013:

(i)  the State Board of Education shall submit to the Economic Development Task Force, by email, a summary report of the reports received under Subsection (1)(a); and

(ii)  each agency shall submit to the Economic Development Task Force, by email, a report on the mitigation efforts currently being used by the agency;

(c)  on or before August 1, 2013, each school district shall develop and submit to the State Board of Education, by email, a plan that describes the mitigation efforts that the school district will implement, within one year after the day on which the plan is submitted, to:

(i)  reduce the emission of air pollutants on a regular basis; and

(ii)  reduce the emission of air pollutants on a day for which the Division of Air Quality issues an air quality action alert; and

(d)  on or before September 1, 2013:

(i)  the State Board of Education shall submit to the Economic Development Task Force, by email, a summary of the plans received under Subsection (1)(c); and

(ii)  each agency shall develop and submit to the Economic Development Task Force, by email, a plan that describes the mitigation efforts that the agency will implement within one year after the day on which the plan is submitted, to:

(A)  reduce the emission of air pollutants on a regular basis; and

(B)  reduce the emission of air pollutants on a day for which the Division of Air Quality issues an air quality action alert.

(2) (a)  A school district is exempt from the provisions of this section if:

(i)  the school district is not, in whole or in part, within a designated county; and

(ii)  the school district's employees do not reside within a designated county.

(b)  A report or plan that an agency is required to submit under this section is not required to contain information in relation to a designated county where an employee of the agency does not reside or work.

(3)  A plan described in Subsection (1)(c) or (d) shall include information regarding additional funds, if any, that are needed in order to implement all or a portion of the plan.



Enacted by Chapter 105, 2013 General Session

